pt-BR: Vestuário e acessórios > Acessórios para sapatos > Capas para calçados: Capas para botas; Protetores de salto; Capas para biqueiras
sl-SI: Oblačila in dodatki > Dodatki za obutev > Zaščitne prevleke za čevlje: Prevleke za škornje; Ščitniki za pete; Prevleke za nožne prste
en: Apparel & Accessories > Shoe Accessories > Shoe Covers: Boot Covers; Heel Protectors; Toe Covers
pt-PT: Acessórios e vestuário > Acessórios para calçado > Coberturas para calçado: Capas para botas; Protetores de calcanhar; Protetores de biqueira
th: เสื้อผ้าและเครื่องประดับ > อุปกรณ์รองเท้า > ที่คลุมรองเท้า: ที่หุ้มรองเท้าบูท; ยางหุ้มส้นรองเท้า; ที่หุ้มปลายรองเท้า
ja: ファッション・アクセサリー > 靴用品 > シューズカバー: ブーツカバー; ヒールプロテクター; トゥカバー
sv: Kläder och accessoarer > Skotillbehör > Skoöverdrag: Stövelskydd; Klackskydd; Tåskydd
fi: Vaatteet ja asusteet > Kenkätarvikkeet > Kengänsuojukset: Saappaiden suojat; Korkosuojat; Kärkisuojat
zh-TW: 服飾與配件 > 鞋類配件 > 鞋罩: 靴套; 鞋跟保護套; 鞋頭保護套
pl: Ubrania i akcesoria > Akcesoria do butów > Ochraniacze na buty: Ochraniacze na buty; Ochraniacze na obcasy; Ochraniacze na czubki butów
sk-SK: Oblečenie a doplnky > Doplnky obuvi > Návleky na topánky: Návleky na topánky; Chrániče päty; Kryty prstov na nohách
ko: 의류/액세서리 > 신발 액세서리 > 신발 커버: 부츠 커버; 힐 프로텍터; 토 커버
ru: Одежда, обувь и аксессуары > Аксессуары для обуви > Бахилы: Чехлы для ботинок; Защита для каблуков; Накладки на мысок
it: Abbigliamento e accessori > Accessori per scarpe > Coperture scarpe: Copristivali; Proteggi tacchi; Copripunte
cs: Oblečení a doplňky > Doplňky k obuvi > Návleky na boty: Návleky na boty; Chrániče podpatků; Návleky na špičky bot
da: Tøj og tilbehør > Tilbehør til sko > Skoovertræk: Støvleovertræk; Hælbeskyttere; Tåovertræk
tr: Kıyafet ve Aksesuarlar > Ayakkabı Aksesuarları > Galoşlar: Çizme kılıfları; Topuk koruyucuları; Burun koruyucuları
de: Bekleidung & Accessoires > Schuh-Accessoires > Überschuhe: Stiefelüberzieher; Absatzschoner; Zehenschoner
nl: Kleding en accessoires > Accessoires voor schoenen > Schoenhoezen: Laarzenhoezen; Hakbeschermers; Teenbeschermers
hr-HR: Odjeća i modni dodaci > Dodaci za obuću > Navlake za obuću: Navlake za čizme; Štitnici za pete; Navlake za nožne prste
es: Ropa y accesorios > Accesorios para zapatos > Fundas para zapatos: Cubrebotas; Protectores de talón; Cubre punteras
hu: Ruházat és kiegészítők > Cipőkiegészítők > Cipőhuzatok: Csizmavédők; Sarokvédők; Cipőorr-védők
vi: Quần áo & Phụ kiện > Phụ kiện giày > Bao giày: Bao bọc ủng; Dụng cụ bảo vệ gót giày; Bao bọc mũi giày
el: Ένδυση και αξεσουάρ > Αξεσουάρ παπουτσιών > Καλύμματα παπουτσιών: Καλύμματα για μπότες; Προστατευτικά τακουνιών; Καλύμματα δαχτύλων
ro-RO: Îmbrăcăminte și accesorii > Accesorii pentru încălțăminte > Huse de protecție pentru încălțăminte: Huse pentru cizme; Protecții pentru toc; Protecții pentru vârful pantofului
zh-CN: 服饰与配饰 > 鞋类配饰 > 鞋套: 靴套; 鞋跟保护套; 鞋头保护套
nb: Klær og tilbehør > Skotilbehør > Skotrekk: Støveltrekk; Hælbeskyttere; Tåtrekk
fr: Vêtements et accessoires > Accessoires pour chaussures > Sur-chaussures: Couvre-bottes; Protège-talons; Couvre-orteils
lt-LT: Apranga ir aksesuarai > Batų aksesuarai > Antbačiai: Batų užvalkalai; Kulno apsaugos; Pirštų apsaugos uždangalai
bg-BG: Облекло и аксесоари > Аксесоари за обувки > Калъфи за обувки: Калъфи за ботуши; Протектори за токове; Протектори за пръсти